Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Background Checks.
§ 63.2-1722.
Revocation or denial of renewal based on background checks; failure to obtain background check.

The Commissioner may revoke or deny renewal of a license of a child welfare agency, assisted living facility, or adult day care center and a child-placing agency may revoke the approval of a foster home if the assisted living facility, adult day care center, child welfare agency, or foster home has knowledge that a person specified in §

63.2-1720

or

63.2-1721

required to have a background check (i) has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) in the case of a child welfare agency or foster home, is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth, and such person has not been granted a waiver by the Commissioner pursuant to §

63.2-1723

or is not subject to the exceptions in subsection B of §

63.2-1720

or subsection E, F, G, or H of §

63.2-1721

, and the facility, center, or agency refuses to separate such person from employment or service or allows the household member to continue to reside in the home.

Failure to obtain background checks pursuant to §§

63.2-1720

and

63.2-1721

shall be grounds for denial, revocation, or termination of a license, registration, or approval or any contract with the Department or a local department to provide child care services to clients of the Department or local department. No violation shall occur if the assisted living facility, adult day care center, child-placing agency, or independent foster home has applied for the background check timely and it has not been obtained due to administrative delay. The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-235; 1968, cc. 578, § 63.1-198, 585; 1975, c. 439; 1985, c. 360; 1992, c. 746; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1995, c. 401; 1996, c. 747; 1997, c. 427; 1998, cc. 551, 581; 2002, c. 747; 2015, cc. 758, 770; 2017, cc. 189, 751, 809; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for a July 1, 2020, expiration date for the 2017 amendments. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for expiration of the 2017 amendments upon repeal of certain provisions of the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014 establishing requirements for national fingerprint-based criminal history background checks for employees and applicants. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “63.2-1720,

63.2-1720.1

,

63.2-1721

, or

63.2-1721.1

” for “63.2-1720 and

63.2-1721

” and “subsection G of §

63.2-1720.1

, or subsection E, F, or G of §

63.2-1721.1

” for “subsection E of § 63.2-1721”; in subsection B, substituted “63.2-1720.1, 63.2-1721, and 63.2-1721.1” for “and 63.2-1721” and “child-placing agency, independent foster home, family day system, family day home, or child day center” for “or child welfare agency”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 189 and 751 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “subsection E, F, G, or H of §

63.2-1721

” for “subsection E, F, or G of §

63.2-1721

.1” and added “or allows the household member to continue to reside in the home”; and inserted “or termination” and “or any contract with the Department or a local department to provide child care services to clients of the Department or local department” in the first sentence of subsection B. For expiration and contingent repeal dates, see Editor’s notes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection A, substituted “(i) has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) in the case of a child welfare agency, foster home, or family day home, is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth” for “has an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, in the introductory wording, deleted “or registration” following “license,” “and a family day system may revoke the approval of a family day home” preceding “if the,” “approved family day home” preceding “has knowledge,” “63.2-1720.1” following “63.2-1720,” “or

63.2-1721

.1” following “63.2-1721,” and in clause (ii), deleted “or family day home” following “foster home,” “subsection G of §

63.2-1720.1

” preceding “or subsection” and “home” following “center”; in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “63.2-1720.1” following “63.2-1720” “and

63.2-1721

.1” following “63.2-1721,” and in the penultimate sentence, deleted “family day system, family day home, or child day center” following “independent foster home” and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-1723.
Child welfare agencies; criminal conviction and waiver.

Any person who seeks to operate or volunteer or work at a child welfare agency and who is disqualified because of a criminal conviction pursuant to §§

63.2-1720

and

63.2-1721

, may apply in writing for a waiver from the Commissioner. The Commissioner may grant a waiver if the Commissioner determines that (i) the person is of good moral character and reputation and (ii) the waiver would not adversely affect the safety and well-being of children in the person’s care. The Commissioner shall not grant a waiver to any person who has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

. The child welfare agency shall notify in writing every parent and guardian of the children in its care of any waiver granted for its operators, employees or volunteers.

The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

1998, cc. 551, 581, § 63.1-198.4; 2001, c. 867; 2002, c. 747; 2015, cc. 758, 770; 2017, c. 809; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “63.2-1720.1” and “63.2-1721.1” in the first sentence, substituted “licensed or registered” for “regulated” in the fourth sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection A, substituted “19.2-392.02” for “63.2-1719” in the third sentence, inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in the fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “pursuant to §§

63.2-1720

and

63.2-1721

” for “or a criminal conviction in the background check of any other adult living in a family day home regulated by the Department, pursuant to §§

63.2-1720

,

63.2-1720.1

,

63.2-1721

,

63.2-1721.1

, and

63.2-1724

” in the first sentence, and preceding the last sentence, deleted three sentences, which read, “However, the Commissioner may grant a waiver to a family day home licensed or registered by the Department if any other adult living in the home of the applicant or provider has been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, provided that (a) five years have elapsed following the conviction and (b) the Department has conducted a home study that includes, but is not limited to, (1) an assessment of the safety of children placed in the home and (2) a determination that the offender is now a person of good moral character and reputation. The waiver shall not be granted if the adult living in the home is an assistant or substitute provider or if such adult has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under both §§

18.2-57

and

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction. Any waiver granted under this section shall be available for inspection by the public” and made stylistic changes.

§§ 63.2-1724,
63.2-1725.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

As to requirement of records check for employees or volunteers of a child day center or family day home that has not met the requirements of §§

63.2-1720

,

63.2-1721

, and

63.2-1724

and that applies to enter into a contract with a local department of social services, see § 63.2-1725.

As to punishment for Class 1 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children, the elderly and disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

.

For current provisions as to records check by unlicensed child day center; penalty, see § 22.1-289.039.

For current provisions as to child day centers or family day homes receiving federal, state, or local child care funds; eligibility requirements, see § 22.1-289.040.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 251, cl. 2 and 510, cl. 3 provide: “That the provisions of
§§

19.2-389

, as it is currently effective,

63.2-1720.1

, and

63.2-1724

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, (i) shall not become effective unless the provisions of Chapter 14.1 ( § 22.1-289.02 et seq.) of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia, except for
§ 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, become effective on a date subsequent to July 1, 2021, and (ii) shall expire upon the effective date of such provisions of Chapter 14.1 of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia.” The amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 251 and
510, to
§

63.2-1724

never took effect.

Former §

63.2-1724

, pertaining to records check by unlicensed child day center; penalty, derived from 1985, c. 360,
§ 63.1-198.2;
1987, cc. 130, 692, 693;
1993, cc. 730,
742;
1998, cc. 551,
581;
2000, cc. 210,
248;
2002, c. 747;
2003, c. 467;
2014, c. 129;
2017, cc. 189,
751,
809.

Former § 63.2-1725, pertaining to child day centers or family day homes receiving federal, state, or local child care funds; eligibility requirements, derived from
1999, c. 727,
§ 63.1-198.5;
2002, c. 747;
2013, c. 261;
2015, cc. 758,
770;
2017, cc. 189,
751,
809.

§ 63.2-1726.
Background check required; children’s residential facilities.

As a condition of employment, volunteering, or providing services on a regular basis, every children’s residential facility that is regulated or operated by the Departments of Social Services, Education, Military Affairs, or Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall require any individual who (i) accepts a position of employment at such a facility, (ii) is employed by such a facility, (iii) volunteers for such a facility, or (iv) provides contractual services directly to a juvenile for such a facility to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information, to be forwarded along with the applicant’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such applicant. The children’s residential facility shall inform the applicant that he is entitled to obtain a copy of any background check report and to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any such report and obtain a prompt resolution before a final determination is made of the applicant’s eligibility to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. The applicant shall provide the children’s residential facility with a written statement or affirmation disclosing whether he has ever been convicted of or is the subject of pending charges for any offense within or outside the Commonwealth. The results of the criminal history background check must be received prior to permitting an applicant to work in the children’s residential facility.The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an individual’s record or notification that no record exists, shall forward it to the state agency which operates or regulates the children’s residential facility with which the applicant is affiliated. The state agency shall, upon receipt of an applicant’s record lacking disposition data, conduct research in whatever state and local recordkeeping systems are available in order to obtain complete data. The state agency shall report to the children’s facility whether the applicant is eligible to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, no children’s residential facility regulated or operated by the Departments of Education, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, Military Affairs, or Social Services shall hire for compensated employment or allow to volunteer or provide contractual services persons who have been convicted of or are the subject of pending charges for (a) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), (iii), or (v) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (b) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(1) in the five years prior to the application date for employment, to be a volunteer, or to provide contractual services or (2) such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

. The provisions of this section also shall apply to residential programs established pursuant to § 16.1-309.3 for juvenile offenders cited in a complaint for intake or in a petition before the court that alleges the juvenile is delinquent or in need of services or supervision and to local secure detention facilities, provided, however, that the provisions of this section related to local secure detention facilities shall only apply to an individual who, on or after July 1, 2013, accepts a position of employment at such local secure detention facility, volunteers at such local secure detention facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties, or provides contractual services directly to a juvenile at a local secure detention facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties. The Central Criminal Records Exchange and the state or local agency that regulates or operates the local secure detention facility shall process the criminal history record information regarding such applicant in accordance with this subsection and subsection B.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, a children’s residential facility may hire for compensated employment or for volunteer or contractual service purposes persons who have been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed such offense in the scope of his employment, volunteer, or contractual services.If the applicant is denied employment or the opportunity to volunteer or provide services at a children’s residential facility because of information appearing on his criminal history record, and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, upon written request of the applicant the state agency shall furnish the applicant the procedures for obtaining his criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The information provided to the children’s residential facility shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

Those individuals listed in clauses (i) through (iv) of subsection A also shall authorize the children’s residential facility to obtain a copy of information from the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

on any investigation of child abuse or neglect undertaken on him. The applicant shall provide the children’s residential facility with a written statement or affirmation disclosing whether he has ever been the subject of a founded case of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth. The children’s residential facility shall receive the results of the central registry search prior to permitting an applicant to work. Children’s residential facilities regulated or operated by the Departments of Education; Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; Military Affairs; and Social Services shall not hire for compensated employment or allow to volunteer or provide contractual services, persons who have a founded case of child abuse or neglect. Every residential facility for juveniles which is regulated or operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be authorized to obtain a copy of the information from the central registry.

The Boards of Social Services; Education; Juvenile Justice; and Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Department of Military Affairs, may adopt regulations to comply with the provisions of this section. Copies of any information received by a children’s residential facility pursuant to this section shall be available to the agency that regulates or operates such facility but shall not be disseminated further. The cost of obtaining the criminal history record and the central registry information shall be borne by the employee or volunteer unless the children’s residential facility, at its option, decides to pay the cost.

History.

1994, c. 704, § 63.1-248.7:2; 1996, c. 747; 2001, c. 138; 2002, c. 747; 2007, c. 573; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, c. 383; 2013, cc. 96, 181; 2016, c. 580; 2017, c. 809; 2019, cc. 100, 282.

Cross references.

As to investigation on receipt of licensing application, see §

63.2-1702

.

As to background investigation requirements for employment in children’s residential facilities licensed pursuant to §

63.2-1701

, see §

63.2-1720

K. As to national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children, the elderly and disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

. As to certain private school employees subject to fingerprinting and criminal records checks, see § 22.1-296.3. As to community group homes and other residential facilities for certain juveniles, see §

66-24

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 573 rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and in the fourth sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A, in the fourth sentence of subsection C, and near the beginning of subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 383, in subsection A, in the last paragraph, in the next-to-last sentence, redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c), in clause (a), inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in § 16.1-253.2,” substituted “as set out in subsection A or B of §

18.2-47

” for “as set out in §

18.2-47

A,” and inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in §

18.2-60.4

” and deleted “or” preceding the clause (b) designator; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 96 and 181 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted “structured” preceding, and “excluding secure detention facilities,” following, “residential programs” and added the language beginning “and to local secure detention facilities provided, however, that the ...” in the fifth sentence, and added the sixth sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 580, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “or an equivalent offense in another state” in clause (b), and inserted clause (d) and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in the second paragraph of subsection A, rewrote the fourth sentence, which formerly listed specific criminal offenses; and inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by c. 100, effective February 21, 2019, and c. 282, effective March
8, 2019, are nearly
identical, and in the first paragraph in subsection A, deleted “who was not employed by that facility prior to July 1, 2007” at the end of clause (i), inserted clause (ii) and the clause (iii) designator, deleted “on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties who was not a volunteer at such facility prior to July 1, 2007” at the end of clause (iii), redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv), substituted “a facility” for “facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties who did not provide such services prior to July 1, 2007” in clause (iv) and substituted “in the children’s residential facility” for “with children” at the end of the paragraph; in the second paragraph in subsection B, deleted the second sentence which read “If the applicant has been permitted to assume duties that do not involve contact with children pending receipt of the report, the children’s residential facility is not precluded from suspending the applicant from his position pending a final determination of the applicant’s eligibility to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children”; and in subsection C, substituted “(i) through (iv)” for “(i), (ii), and (iii)” in the first sentence and deleted “alone with children” at the end of the third sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

The phrase “in the scope of his employment”

means the offense must have occurred in connection with the individual’s work at a covered facility. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable T. Scott Garrett, M.D., Member, House of Delegates, No. 15-003,
(7/31/15).

§ 63.2-1727.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as
prohibition of sex offender or child abuser against operating or residing in family day home; penalty, see § 22.1-289.041.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1727

, pertaining to prohibition of sex offender or child abuser against operating or residing in family day home; penalty, derived from
1994, c. 126,
§ 63.1-198.3;
1998, cc. 551,
581;
2002, c. 747;
2006, cc. 796,
804;
2015, cc. 758,
770.